Utah statutes.
59-10-1403.   Income tax treatment of a pass-through entity -- Returns -- Classification same as under Internal Revenue Code.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (3), a pass-through entity is not subject to a tax imposed by this chapter.

(2)  The income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a pass-through entity shall be passed through to one or more pass-through entity taxpayers as provided in this part.

(3)  A pass-through entity is subject to the return filing requirements of Section 59-10-507.

(4)  A pass-through entity that transacts business in the state shall be classified for purposes of taxation under this title in the same manner as the pass-through entity is classified for federal income tax purposes.



Amended by Chapter 312, 2009 General Session

